Wisconsin, session 2025, AB811.
do enact as follows:AB811,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB811,28Section 2. 20.192 (1) (br) of the statutes is created to read:AB811,2,10920.192 (1) (br) Main street bounceback grants. The amounts in the schedule 10for grants awarded under s. 238.129.AB811,311Section 3. 238.129 of the statutes is created to read:AB811,2,1512238.129 Main street bounceback grants. (1) Grants. From the 13appropriation under s. 20.192 (1) (br), the corporation may award grants to provide 14assistance to businesses opening a new location or expanding operations in a vacant 15commercial space.AB811,2,2016(2) Eligibility. (a) Subject to par. (b), the corporation shall establish 17eligibility requirements and other policies and procedures for the grants awarded 18under sub. (1) that are substantially similar to the eligibility requirements and 19policies and procedures in effect on June 30, 2023, for the Wisconsin Tomorrow 20Main Street Bounceback Grant program administered by the corporation.AB811,2,2221(b) The corporation may not award a grant under this section to a nonprofit 22organization.AB811,2,2323